Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB967.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended by adding a subclause to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act.* * *(4) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" mean any one or more of the following:* * *(xx.1) For the resale of a ticket in this Commonwealth:123456789101112131415161718 (A) Charging a fee in excess of the following caps:(I) The fee charged to the purchaser of the ticket may not exceed five percent (5%) of the ticket price.(II) The fee charged by the ticket reseller of the ticket may not exceed five percent (5%) of the ticket price.(B) As used in this subclause:(I) "Purchaser" means a person buying a ticket at resale.(II) "Resale" means the second or subsequent sale of a ticket by any means, including in person, by telephone, by mail, by email, by facsimile or through a website or other electronic means.(III) "Ticket" means physical, electronic or other evidence that grants to the possessor of the evidence license to enter a place of entertainment for one or more events at a specified date and time.(IV) "Ticket reseller" means a person who, for compensation, commission or otherwise, is engaged in reselling admission tickets to a sporting, musical, theater or other entertainment event.Section 2. The addition of section 2(4)(xx.1) of the act shall apply to fees in the resale of tickets that are charged on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0967PN1048 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223